test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kar_gt-norm.yaml
     кар+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [каррезнымтӧг, каррезтӧгьяным]
     кар+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: каррезнымла
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: каррезнымся
     кар+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: каррезаным
     кар+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [каррезсиным, карресиным]
     кар+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: каррезаным
     кар+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [каррезнымлань, каррезланяным]
     кар+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [каррезнымсянь, каррезсяняным]
     кар+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [каррезӧттяным, каррезӧттиным]
     кар+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [каррезӧдззаным, каррезӧдззиным]
     кар+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: каррезнымви
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: каррезланяным
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: каррезланьсиным
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: каррезланяным
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [каррезланьсяняным, каррезнымланьсянь]
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [каррезланьӧттяным, каррезланьӧттиным, каррезнымланьӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [каррезланьӧдззаным, каррезланьӧдззиным, каррезнымланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: каррезнымланьви
     кар+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: каррезныт
     кар+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: каррезнытлӧн
     кар+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: каррезнытлісь
     кар+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: каррезнытлӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: каррезнытӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: каррезнаныт
     кар+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: каррезныткӧт
     кар+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [каррезныттӧг, каррезтӧгьяныт]
     кар+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: каррезнытла
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: каррезнытся
     кар+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: каррезаныт
     кар+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [каррезсиныт, карресиныт]
     кар+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: каррезаныт
     кар+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [каррезнытлань, каррезланяныт]
     кар+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [каррезнытсянь, каррезсяняныт]
     кар+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [каррезӧттяныт, каррезӧттиныт]
     кар+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [каррезӧдззаныт, каррезӧдззиныт]
     кар+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: каррезнытви
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: каррезланяныт
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: каррезланьсиныт
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: каррезланяныт
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [каррезланьсяняныт, каррезнытланьсянь]
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [каррезланьӧттяныт, каррезланьӧттиныт, каррезнытланьӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [каррезланьӧдззаныт, каррезланьӧдззиныт, каррезнытланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: каррезнытланьви
     кар+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: каррезныс
     кар+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: каррезныслӧн
     кар+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: каррезныслісь
     кар+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: каррезныслӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: каррезнысӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: каррезнаныс
     кар+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: каррезныскӧт
     кар+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [каррезныстӧг, каррезтӧгьяныс]
     кар+N+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: каррезнысла
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: каррезнысся
     кар+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: каррезаныс
     кар+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [каррезсиныс, карресиныс]
     кар+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: каррезаныс
     кар+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [каррезныслань, каррезланяныс]
     кар+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [каррезныссянь, каррезсяняныс]
     кар+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [каррезӧттяныс, каррезӧттиныс]
     кар+N+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [каррезӧдззаныс, каррезӧдззиныс]
     кар+N+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: каррезнысви
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: каррезланяныс
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: каррезланьсиныс
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: каррезланяныс
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [каррезланьсяняныс, каррезнысланьсянь]
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [каррезланьӧттяныс, каррезланьӧттиныс, каррезнысланьӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [каррезланьӧдззаныс, каррезланьӧдззиныс, каррезнысланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: каррезнысланьви
